Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1226
Motorboat; certificate of number
and number awarded; period valid; renewal; fee.

(1) Every
certificate of number and number awarded pursuant to the State Boat Act shall
continue in full force and effect for a period of three years unless sooner
terminated or discontinued. The numbering periods shall commence January 1
of each year and expire on December 31 of every three-year numbering period
thereafter.

(2) Certificates of number and the number awarded may be renewed by
the owner by presenting the previously issued certificate of number to the
county treasurer or an agent authorized to issue renewals. An owner
whose registration has expired shall have until March 1 following the year
of expiration to renew such registration.

(3) The fee for renewal shall be the same as for original registration
as provided in section 37-1214.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 26;

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 114;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 13.